Utah statutes.
4-30-8.   Weighman license required -- Application -- Fee -- Bond --
Expiration -- Renewal.
(1)  No person may act as a weighman at a livestock market without a license
from the department.  Application for a weighman's license shall be made to
the department upon forms prescribed and furnished by it.  Upon receipt of a
proper application, payment of a license fee in an amount determined by the
department pursuant to Subsection 4-2-2(2), and deposit of either a corporate
surety bond or trust fund agreement with the department in the principal
amount of $1,000, the commissioner shall issue a license allowing the
applicant to act as a weighman through December 31 of the year in which the
license is issued, subject to suspension or revocation for cause.  A
weighman's license is annually renewable on or before December 31 of each year
upon the payment of an annual license renewal fee in an amount determined by
the department pursuant to Subsection 4-2-2(2).
(2)  Each weighman's surety bond shall be written by a surety licensed under
the laws of Utah and name the state, as obligee, for the use and benefit of
persons who consign livestock to a livestock market.  The bond shall further
be conditioned for the faithful and accurate weighing of livestock consigned
to a livestock market, and for the payment of court costs and a reasonable
attorney's fee to the prevailing party incident to any suit brought upon the
bond.
